Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-167
Member of military forces; active service; exempt from arrest on civil process.

No member of the military forces of the State of Nebraska shall be arrested, or served with any summons, order, warrant, or other civil process after having been ordered to active service of the state or while going to, or attending any place to which he is required to go for active service of the state; but nothing herein shall prevent his arrest for a felony or misdemeanor committed while not in the line of duty.

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 65, p. 1603.